District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.170

Repealed

Close corporations — Effect of close corporation provisions on other laws.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 170
as added Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(qqq), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 29-399.69.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.170.